Utah statutes.
11-49-103.   Local ethics commission permitted -- Filing requirements.

(1)  A political subdivision, other than a municipality described in Section 10-3-1311 or a county described in Section 17-16a-11, may establish a local political subdivision ethics commission within the political subdivision to review a complaint against a political subdivision officer or employee subject to Title 67, Chapter 16, Utah Public Officers' and Employees' Ethics Act.

(2)  A political subdivision may enter into an interlocal agreement with another political subdivision, in accordance with Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, to establish a local political subdivision ethics commission to review a complaint against a political subdivision officer or employee subject to Title 67, Chapter 16, Utah Public Officers' and Employees' Ethics Act.

(3) (a)  A person filing a complaint for an ethics violation of Title 67, Chapter 16, Utah Public Officers' and Employees' Ethics Act, shall file the complaint with:

(i)  a local political subdivision ethics commission, if the political subdivision has established a local political subdivision ethics commission under Subsection (1) or (2); or

(ii)  the commission if the political subdivision has not established a local political subdivision ethics commission.

(b)  A political subdivision that receives a complaint described in Subsection (3)(a) may:

(i)  accept the complaint if the political subdivision has established a local political subdivision ethics commission in accordance with Subsection (1) or (2); or

(ii)  forward the complaint to the commission:

(A)  regardless of whether the political subdivision has established a local political subdivision ethics commission; or

(B)  if the political subdivision has not established a local political subdivision ethics commission.



Enacted by Chapter 202, 2012 General Session

